trunk/apertium-mk-en/apertium-mk-en.mk.dix
    <pardef n="Монте_Карло/в__adj">
      <e>        <p>          <l>в</l>            <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>виот</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>виов</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>вион</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ва</l>           <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>вата</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>вава</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>вана</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>во</l>           <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>вото</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>вово</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>воно</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>ви</l>           <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>вите</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>виве</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l>вине</l>         <r>в<s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="фер__adj"> <!-- does not decline -->
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>           <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>           <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>           <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>           <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="prx"/></r></p></e>
      <e>        <p>          <l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="dst"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- предлози -->
    <pardef n="и__cnjcoo">
      <e>        <p>          <l/>	  <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ако__cnjsub">
      <e>        <p>          <l/>	  <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/во__pr">
      <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>во</l>	  <r>во<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR">        <p>          <l>в</l>	  <r>во<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL">        <p>          <l><a/>во</l><r>во<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="за__pr">
      <e>        <p>          <l/>	  <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- adverbs -->

    <pardef n="денес__adv">
      <e>        <p>          <l/>	  <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <!--  particle -->
    <pardef n="ќе__part">
      <e>        <p>          <l/>	  <r><s n="part"/><s n="exp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="да__part">
      <e>        <p>          <l/>	  <r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="ли"><i>ли</i><par n="да__part"/></e>
    <e lm="да"><i>да</i><par n="да__part"/></e>
    <e lm="ќе"><i>ќе</i><par n="ќе__part"/></e>
    <e lm="нели"><i>нели</i><par n="да__part"/></e>
    <e lm="зар"><i>зар</i><par n="да__part"/></e>
    <e lm="и"><i>и</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="а"><i>а</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="или"><i>или</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="па"><i>па</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="но"><i>но</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="туку"><i>туку</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="ниту"><i>ниту</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="ни"><i>ни</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
	<e lm="енд"><i>енд</i><par n="и__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="што"><i>што</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="оти"><i>оти</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="ако"><i>ако</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="иако"><i>иако</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="при што"><i>при<b/>што</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="дека"><i>дека</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="додека"><i>додека</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="макар што"><i>макар<b/>што</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="така што"><i>така<b/>што</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="макар"><i>макар</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="во"><i></i><par n="/во__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="кај"><i>кај</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="на"><i>на</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="од"><i>од</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="до"><i>до</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="со"><i>со</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="без"><i>без</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="околу"><i>околу</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="по"><i>по</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="после"><i>после</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="спрема"><i>спрема</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="врз"><i>врз</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="вон"><i>вон</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="зад"><i>зад</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="заради"><i>заради</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="кон"><i>кон</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="крај"><i>крај</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="меѓу"><i>меѓу</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="над"><i>над</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="насред"><i>насред</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="низ"><i>низ</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="освен"><i>освен</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="под"><i>под</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="покрај"><i>покрај</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="помеѓу"><i>помеѓу</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="поради"><i>поради</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="посред"><i>посред</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="пред"><i>пред</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="през"><i>през</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="преку"><i>преку</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="при"><i>при</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="против"><i>против</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="сред"><i>сред</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="според"><i>според</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="спроти"><i>спроти</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="со"><i>со</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="во висина од"><i>во<b/>висина<b/>од</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="во текот на"><i>во<b/>текот<b/>на</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="наспрема"><i>наспрема</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="и покрај"><i>и<b/>покрај</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="како"><i>како</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="како и"><i>како<b/>и</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="еко"><par n="P__adj"/><i>еко</i><par n="фер__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="про"><par n="P__adj"/><i>про</i><par n="фер__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="монте карлов"><i>Монте<b/>Карло</i><par n="Монте_Карло/в__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="анти"><par n="P__adj"/><i>анти</i><par n="фер__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="веле"><par n="P__adj"/><i>веле</i><par n="фер__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="арт"><par n="P__adj"/><i>арт</i><par n="фер__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="прес"><par n="P__adj"/><i>прес</i><par n="фер__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="сите"><par n="P__adj"/><i>сите</i><par n="фер__adj"/></e>
	<e lm="фер"><par n="P__adj"/><i>фер</i><par n="фер__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="сеуште" r="LR"><p><l>сеуште</l><r>се<b/>уште</r></p><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="подеднакво"><i>подеднакво</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="повторно"><i>постојано</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="официјално"><i>официјално</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="условно"><i>условно</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="толку"><i>толку</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="дури"><i>дури</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="дома"><i>дома</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="назад"><i>назад</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="исто така"><i>исто<b/>така</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="односно"><i>односно</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="подоцна"><i>подоцна</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="претходно"><i>претходно</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="сепак"><i>сепак</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="бегло"><i>бегло</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="вечер"><i>вечер</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="веќе неколку недели"><i>веќе<b/>неколку<b/>недели</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="веќе неколку години"><i>веќе<b/>неколку<b/>години</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="за време на"><i>за<b/>време<b/>на</i><par n="за__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="за неколку недели"><i>за<b/>неколку<b/>недели</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="како пример"><i>како<b/>пример</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="на пример"><i>на<b/>пример</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="најголем дел од"><i>најголем<b/>дел<b/>од</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="освен тоа што"><i>освен<b/>тоа<b/>што</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="што е можно повеќе"><i>што<b/>е<b/>можно<b/>повеќе</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="горе"><i>горе</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="досега"><i>досега</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="кога-годе"><i>кога-годе</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="лошо"><i>лошо</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="надве-натри"><i>надве-натри</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="наскоро"><i>наскоро</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="никогаш"><i>никогаш</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="пеша"><i>пеша</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="право"><i>право</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="сосема"><i>сосема</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="овојпат"><i>овојпат</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="честопати"><i>честопати</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="споро"><i>споро</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="двапати"><i>двапати</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="онака како"><i>онака<b/>како</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="одамна"><i>одамна</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="дали"><i>дали</i><par n="да__part"/></e>
	<e lm="откако"><i>откако</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="штом"><i>штом</i><par n="ако__cnjsub"/></e>
	<e lm="воопшто"><i>воопшто</i><par n="денес__adv"/></e>
	<e lm="нето"><par n="P__adj"/><i>нето</i><par n="фер__adj"/></e>
